Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1614
Authorization to operate; nontransferable; change in ownership; new authorization.

The authorization to operate shall be issued to the owner or governing body of the applicant school and shall be nontransferable. In the event of a change in ownership of the school, the new owner or governing body shall, within ten days after the change of ownership, apply for a new authorization to operate, and in the event of failure to do so the authorization to operate shall terminate. An application for a new authorization to operate by reason of change in the ownership of the school shall be deemed an application for renewal of the school's authorization to operate.

Laws 1977, LB 486, § 15;

Laws 1990, LB 488, § 14;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2815;

Laws 1995, LB 4, § 14.